Utah statutes.
53A-12-204.   Purchase of textbooks by local school board -- Sales to pupils
-- Free textbooks -- Textbooks provided to teachers -- Payment of costs --
Rental of textbooks.
(1)  A local school board, under rules adopted by the State Board of
Education, may purchase textbooks for use in the public schools directly from
the publisher at prices and terms approved by the state board and may sell
those books to pupils in grades nine through 12 at a cost not to exceed the
actual cost of the book plus costs of transportation and handling.
(2)  Each local school board, however, shall provide, free of charge,
textbooks and workbooks required for courses of instruction for each child
attending public schools whose parent or guardian is financially unable to
purchase them.
(3)  Children who are receiving cash assistance under Title 35A, Chapter 3,
Part 3, Family Employment Program, supplemental security income, or who are in
the custody of the Division of Child and Family Services within the Department
of Human Services are eligible for free textbooks and workbooks under this
section.
(4)  The local school board shall also purchase all books necessary for
teachers to conduct their classes.
(5)  The cost of furnishing textbooks and workbooks may be paid from school
operating funds, the textbook fund, or from other available funds.
(6)  Books provided to teachers and pupils without charge or at less than full
cost are paid for out of funds of the district and remain the property of the
district.
(7)  In school districts that require pupils to rent books instead of
purchasing them or providing them free of charge, the local school board shall
waive rental fees for a child whose parent or guardian is financially unable
to pay the rental fee.  The children considered eligible under Subsection (3)
are also eligible for the purposes of this Subsection (7).
